pt-BR: Estilo de fatia: Dobra; Cubo/bastão; Julienne; Fita; Folha; Liso; Waffle; Outro
it: Stile di taglio: Increspatura; Cubo/bastoncino; Julienne; Nastro; Foglio; Dritto; Waffle; Altro
es: Estilo de rebanada: Arruga; Cubo/palo; Corte en juliana; Cinta; Hoja; Liso; Gofre; Otros
ru: Тип нарезки: Рифленый; Кубик/брусок; Соломка; Ленты; Пласты; Прямой срез; Вафельная; Другое
da: Skivestil: Foldet; Terning/pind; Julienne; Bånd; Ark; Lige; Vaffel; Andet
fr: Type de découpe: Froissé; Cube/bâtonnet; Julienne; À ruban; En feuille; Lisses; Gaufre; Autre
vi: Kiểu lát cắt: Gợn sóng; Dạng khối/dạng que; Cắt sợi Julienne; Ruy-băng; Tờ; Thẳng; Bánh quế; Khác
zh-TW: 切片樣式: 波浪; 切丁/切條; 切絲; 切條; 切片; 直切; 切丁; 其他
cs: Typ plátku: Vlnitý plátek; Kostička/proužek; Jemné nudličky (julienne); Proužky; Plátky; Rovný řez; Vafle; Jiné
sl-SI: Slog rezine: Gubanje; Kocka/palčka; Julienne; Tračni; Blago; Ravni; Vafelj; Drug
hu: Szeletelés stílusa: Hullámos; Kocka/pálcika; Julienne; Szalag; Lap; Egyenes; Ostya; Egyéb
nl: Snijstijl: Gegolfd; Blokjes/reepjes; Julienne; Lint; Blad; Steil; Wafel; Overig
hr-HR: Stil ploške: Iskrivljeni rez; Kocka/štapić; Julienne; Ribbon; Sheet; Ravna; Vafl; Ostalo
de: Schnittart: Geriffelt; Würfel/Stab; Julienne; Schleife; Blatt; Gerade; Waffel; Sonstiges
nb: Kuttestil: Krølle; Kube/pinne; Julienne; Bånd; Ark; Rett; Vaffel; Annet
sv: Skivstil: Skrynkla; Kub/pinne; Julienne; Band; Ark; Rakt; Våffla; Annat
ro-RO: Stil de felie: Ondulat; Cub/băț; Julienne; Fâșie; Foaie; Drept; Vafă; Altele
sk-SK: Štýl rezu: Vrúbkované; Kocka/prúžok; Julienne; Pásik; Hárok; Rovný; Vafle; Iné
ko: 슬라이스 스타일: 크링클; 큐브/스틱; 줄리엔; 리본; 시트; 일자형; 와플; 기타
ja: スライスのスタイル: くリンクル; キューブ/スティック; 千切り; リボン; シート; ストレート; ワッフル; その他
pt-PT: Estilo de fatia: Frisado; Cubos/palitos; Juliana; Fita; Folha; Liso; Waffle; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на среза: Вълнообразно; Кубче/пръчка; Жулиен; Лентово; Лист; Право; Вафлички; Друго
zh-CN: 切片风格: 波浪形; 条/棒状; 切丝; 带状; 片状; 直型; 格子; 其他
en: Slice style: Crinkle; Cube/stick; Julienne; Ribbon; Sheet; Straight; Waffle; Other
th: รูปแบบการหั่น: แบบรอยหยัก; ลูกบาศก์/แท่ง; ซอยเป็นเส้นเล็ก; ริบบิ้น; แบบแผ่น; ตรง; วัฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ κοπής: Ζάρωμα; Κύβος/ραβδί; Ζουλιέν; Κορδέλα; Φύλλο; Ίσια; Κυματιστή; Άλλο
tr: Dilim stili: Tırtıklı; Küp/çubuk; Jülyen; Şerit; Yaprak; Düz; Waffle; Diğer
pl: Typ krojenia: Karbowany; Kostka / słupek; Julienne; Wstążki; Plastry; Proste; Waflowe; Inne
lt-LT: Pjaustymo tipas: Banguotas; Kubas / lazdelė; Julienne; Juostos; Lakštai; Tiesus; Vaflių; Kita
fi: Viipaleen tyyli: Poimutus; Kuutio/tikku; Julienne; Nauha; Levy; Suora; Ristikko; Muu